Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 11. Flag, Insignia, Seal, etc.

§ 491.
Coat of Arms; Crest; Motto and Badge.

The Coat of Arms, Crest, Motto and Badge of the State shall be and are described as follows:

Coat of Arms. Green, a landscape occupying half of the shield; on the right and left, in the background, high mountains, blue; the sky, yellow. From near the base and reaching nearly to the top of the shield, arises a pine tree of the natural color and between three erect sheaves, yellow, placed diagonally on the right side and a red cow standing on the left side of the field.

Motto and Badge. On a scroll beneath the shield, the motto: Vermont; Freedom and Unity. The Vermonter’s badge: two pine branches of natural color, crossed between the shield and scroll.

Crest. A buck’s head, of natural color, placed on a scroll, blue and yellow.

§ 492.
Design of Coat of Arms.

The Secretary of State shall keep in the archives of his or her office a representation of the Coat of Arms according to the foregoing description.

§ 493.
State Seal.

The State Seal shall be the Great Seal of the State, a faithful reproduction, cut larger and deeper, of the original seal, designed by Ira Allen, cut by Reuben Dean of Windsor and accepted by resolution of the General Assembly, dated February 20, 1779.
The Seal shall be kept by the Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs.

§ 494.
Use of State Seal.

The Vermont Development Board may, with the prior written consent of the Governor, reproduce the seal of the State of Vermont in any State-sponsored publication whether or not advertising is included in such publication.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 18(a), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 495.
State Flag.

The Flag of the State shall be blue with the Coat of Arms of the State thereon.

§ 496.
State Flags, purchase, distribution.

The Secretary of State shall obtain, through the Department of Buildings and General Services, State Flags. The Secretary may, on terms that he or she finds appropriate, distribute these State Flags to other states; to State officials, departments, and agencies; and to other persons the Secretary may determine should receive them.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 120

, § 1, eff. May 16, 1961; amended

1963, No. 77

, §§ 1, 2, eff. May 2, 1963;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996;

2017, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 496a.
Bennington Battle Flag.

The Secretary of State shall obtain, through the Department of Buildings and General Services, two copies of the Bennington Battle Flag, one for delivery to the Sergeant at Arms to be flown at the State House in Montpelier, under the U.S. Flag, on the 15th, 16th, and 17th days of August each year to commemorate the Battle of Bennington, and a second for delivery to the Vermont Division for Historic Preservation, along with one Vermont State Flag, to be flown at the Bennington Battle Monument Area.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 496b.
Green Mountain Boys Flag.

The Secretary of State shall obtain, through the Department of Buildings and General Services, a copy of the Green Mountain Boys Flag for delivery to the Sergeant at Arms to be flown at the State House in Montpelier, under the U.S. Flag, on the 15th day of January each year to commemorate Vermont’s independence.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 496c.
POW-MIA flag; flying on State flagpoles.

The State of Vermont shall fly on State-owned flagpoles, where practicable, the National League of Families Prisoner of War and Missing in Action Flag, as designated in 36 U.S.C. § 902, provided the flag is donated.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 496d.
Flag protocol.

The Department of Buildings and General Services shall adopt and update as necessary a protocol for the flying of any flag on a State-owned flagpole and on municipally owned flagpoles if statutorily directed. The protocol shall incorporate any existing flag-flying policies or protocols that the Department has previously adopted.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 496e.
Honor and Remember Flag.

The Honor and Remember Flag is designated as the flag that recognizes those Vermonters who died during or as the result of serving on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces. This designation will recognize their bravery and educate Vermonters about the sacrifices their fellow citizens have made to protect our nation. The Department of Buildings and General Services shall establish a protocol for the flying of the Honor and Remember Flag and may accept donations of the flag to be flown on State-owned flagpoles. The Honor and Remember Flag may be flown on State-owned and municipally owned flagpoles, including those at military facilities, war memorials, and veterans cemeteries on such days as the Department of Buildings and General Services shall designate in the protocol.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 3, 2018.

§ 497.
State Bird.

The State Bird shall be the hermit thrush.

§ 498.
State Flower.

The State Flower shall be the red clover.

§ 499.
State Tree.

The State Tree shall be the sugar maple.

§ 500.
State Animal.

The State Animal shall be the Morgan horse.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 42

, § 1, eff. March 23, 1961.

§ 501.
State Fish.

The State Cold Water Fish shall be the brook trout (
salvelinus fontinalis
) and the State Warm Water Fish shall be the walleye pike (

sander vitreus

).

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 82

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 13, 2012.

§ 502.
State Insect.

The State Insect shall be the honeybee.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 17, 1978.

§ 503.
State Beverage.

The State Beverage shall be milk.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 22

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1983.

§ 504.
State Soil.

The State Soil shall be the Tunbridge soil series.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 9

, § 1, eff. Mar. 27, 1985.

§ 505.
State Butterfly.

The State Butterfly shall be the monarch.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 72

, § 1, eff. June 8, 1987.

§ 506.
State Gem.

The State Gem shall be the grossular garnet.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 28, 1992.

§ 507.
State Rocks.

The State Rocks shall be marble, granite, and slate.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 28, 1992.

§ 508.
State Mineral.

The State Mineral shall be talc.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 28, 1992.

§ 509.
State Fossils.

The State Marine Fossil shall be the white whale fossilized skeleton at the University of Vermont’s Perkins Geology Museum.

The State Terrestrial Fossil shall be the Mount Holly mammoth tooth and tusk at the Mount Holly Community Historical Museum.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 66

, § 1, eff. June 6, 1993; amended

2013, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 15a.

§ 510.
State Flavor.

The State Flavor shall be maple from the Vermont sugar maple tree.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 26, 1994.

§ 511.
State Amphibian.

The State Amphibian shall be the northern leopard frog.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 21, 1998.

§ 512.
State Pie.

The State Pie shall be apple pie.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 15

, § 1, eff. May 10, 1999.

§ 513.
State Fruit.

The State Fruit shall be the apple.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 15

, § 3, eff. May 10, 1999.

§ 514.
State Song.

The State Song shall be “These Green Mountains.”

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 5, 2000.

§ 515.
State Heritage Livestock Breed.

The Randall Lineback breed of cattle shall be an official State Heritage breed of livestock.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 516.
State Sports.

The State Winter Sports shall be skiing and snowboarding.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 8, 2012.

§ 517.
State Fly-Fishing Fly.

The State Fly-Fishing Fly shall be the Governor Aiken bucktail streamer.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 518.
State Latin Motto.

The State Latin Motto shall be
Stella quarta decima fulgeat
(May the 14th star shine bright).

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 6

, § 1.

§ 519.
State Vegetable.

The State Vegetable shall be the Gilfeather turnip.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.